Utah statutes.
41-6a-601.   Speed regulations -- Safe and appropriate speeds at certain
locations -- Prima facie speed limits -- Emergency power of the governor.
(1)  A person may not operate a vehicle at a speed greater than is reasonable
and prudent under the existing conditions, giving regard to the actual and
potential hazards then existing, including when:
(a)  approaching and crossing an intersection or railroad grade crossing;
(b)  approaching and going around a curve;
(c)  approaching a hill crest;
(d)  traveling upon any narrow or winding roadway; and
(e) approaching other hazards that exist due to pedestrians, other traffic,
weather, or highway conditions.
(2) Subject to Subsections (1) and (4) and Sections 41-6a-602 and 41-6a-603,
the following speeds are lawful:
(a)  20 miles per hour in a reduced speed school zone as defined in Section
41-6a-303;
(b)  25 miles per hour in any urban district; and
(c)  55 miles per hour in other locations.
(3)  Except as provided in Section 41-6a-604, any speed in excess of the
limits provided in  this section or established under Sections 41-6a-602 and
41-6a-603 is prima facie evidence that the speed is not reasonable or prudent
and that it is unlawful.
(4)  The governor by proclamation in time of war or emergency may change the
speed limits on the highways of the state.
